Utah statutes.
41-1a-213.   Contents of registration cards.
(1)  The registration card shall be delivered to the owner and shall contain:
(a)  the date issued;
(b)  the name and address of the owner;
(c)  a description of the vehicle registered including the year, the make, the
identification number, and the license plate assigned to the vehicle;
(d)  the expiration date; and
(e)  other information as determined by the commission.
(2)  If a vehicle is leased for a period in excess of 45 days, the
registration shall contain:
(a)  the owner's name;
(b)  the name of the lessee; and
(c)  the bona fide residence address of the lessee.
(3)  On all vehicles registered under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(d) and (1)(e),
the registration card shall also contain the gross laden weight as given in
the application for registration.
